New Jersey, session 221, S1487.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall require that applicants 1[who receive] for any housing, shelter, or rental assistance programs administered by the Department of Community Affairs, including but not limited to,1 rental assistance that is administered by the department and authorized pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. s.1437f) 1, the State rental assistance program, established pursuant to P.L.2004, c.140 (C.52:27D-287.1 et seq.), and any other similar State-administered programs related to housing, shelter, or rental assistance,1 are not limited to online application options.  The commissioner shall ensure, to the extent permitted by federal law, that a person is able to apply through regular mail, electronic mail, 1in-person delivery,1 or fax. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except the commissioner may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.